North Carolina, session 2025, SB599.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:

PART I. APPROPRIATIONS

APPROPRIATIONS
SECTION 1.1.(a) Effective July 1, 2025, there is appropriated from the General
Fund the sum of eight hundred eighty-one million two hundred sixty-two thousand five hundred
ninety-nine dollars ($881,262,599) in recurring funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year and the sum
of one billion twenty-one million seventy thousand two hundred forty-one dollars
($1,021,070,241) in recurring funds for the 2026-2027 fiscal year for the costs associated with
implementing the provisions of this act. These sums are allocated as follows:

Entity 2025-2026 2026-2027

North Carolina Community
College System 38,674,539 38,674,539
Department of Public Instruction 484,989,426 624,797,068
The University of North Carolina 103,777,699 103,777,699
DHHS – Aging 82,276 82,276
DHHS – Central Management
and Support 1,729,614 1,729,614
DHHS – Child and Family Well-Being 557,078 557,078
DHHS – Child Development and
Early Education 54,930 54,930
DHHS – Public Health 952,035 952,035
*S599-v-5*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
DHHS – Social Services 357,308 357,308
DHHS – Health Benefits 537,259 537,259
DHHS – Services for the
Blind/Deaf/Hard of Hearing 112,788 112,788
DHHS – Mental Health/Dev. Disabl./Substance
Use Services 8,075,529 8,075,529
DHHS – Health Service Regulation 610,009 610,009
DHHS – Emp. & Indp. For
People With Disabilities 444,883 444,883
Dept. of Agriculture &
Consumer Services 2,791,328 2,791,328
Dept. of Commerce 279,595 279,595
Dept. of Env. Quality 1,763,143 1,763,143
Dept. of Labor 540,375 540,375
Dept. of Natural and Cultural Resources 5,907,686 5,907,686
Wildlife Resources Comm. 1,782,055 1,782,055
Administrative Office of the Courts 18,636,552 18,636,552
Indigent Defense Services 2,602,376 2,602,376
Department of Adult Correction 143,083,422 143,083,422
Department of Justice 1,790,840 1,790,840
Dept. of Public Safety 45,896,798 45,896,798
State Bureau of Investigation 5,220,195 5,220,195
Dept. of Administration 770,895 770,895
Office of Admin. Hearings 152,033 152,033
Auditor 387,657 387,657
Office of Budget and Management 224,490 224,490
Controller 588,360 588,360
Board of Elections 178,320 178,320
General Assembly 2,125,861 2,125,861
Office of the Governor 135,528 135,528
Office of State Human Resources 201,702 201,702
Industrial Commission 312,439 312,439
Dept. of Insurance 1,419,695 1,419,695
Office of State Fire Marshal 199,415 199,415
Office of the Lt. Governor 30,399 30,399
Dept. of Military and Veteran Affairs 162,304 162,304
Department of Revenue 2,112,540 2,112,540
Secretary of State 471,477 471,477
Dept. of Information Technology 539,746 539,746

SECTION 1.1.(b) Effective July 1, 2025, there is appropriated from the Highway
Fund to the Department of Transportation for the costs associated with implementing the
provisions of this act the sum of twenty-four million eight hundred eighty-four thousand six
hundred forty-eight dollars ($24,884,648) in recurring funds each year of the 2025-2027 fiscal
biennium.
SECTION 1.1.(c) Effective July 1, 2025, there is appropriated from the General
Fund to a Reserve for Local Law Enforcement Officer Bonuses the sum of forty million
seventy-five thousand dollars ($40,075,000) in nonrecurring funds in each year of the 2025-2027
fiscal biennium for the costs associated with awarding bonuses to local sworn law enforcement
officers as provided by Section 3.23 of this act.
Page 2 Senate Bill 599-Fifth Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 1.1.(d) Departmental receipts, as defined in G.S. 143C-1-1, are
appropriated for each year of the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium up to the amounts needed to
implement the legislatively mandated salary increases and employee benefit increases provided
in this act for each year of the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium.

PART II. COMPENSATION OF PUBLIC SCHOOL EMPLOYEES

TEACHER SALARY SCHEDULE
SECTION 2.1.(a) The following monthly teacher salary schedule shall apply for the
2025-2026 fiscal year to licensed personnel of the public schools who are classified as teachers.
The salary schedule is based on years of teaching experience.
2025-2026 Teacher Monthly Salary Schedule
Years of Experience "A" Teachers
0 $4,800
1 $4,825
2 $4,850
3 $4,875
4 $4,900
5 $4,950
6 $5,000
7 $5,050
8 $5,100
9 $5,150
10 $5,200
11 $5,250
12 $5,300
13 $5,350
14 $5,403
15 $5,496
16 $5,521
17 $5,546
18 $5,571
19 $5,591
20 $5,611
21 $5,631
22 $5,651
23 $5,671
24 $5,691
25+ $5,711
SECTION 2.1.(b) Salary Supplements for Teachers Paid on This Salary Schedule.
–
(1) Licensed teachers who have NBPTS certification shall receive a salary
supplement each month of twelve percent (12%) of their monthly salary on
the "A" salary schedule.
(2) Licensed teachers who are classified as "M" teachers shall receive a salary
supplement each month of ten percent (10%) of their monthly salary on the
"A" salary schedule.
(3) Licensed teachers with licensure based on academic preparation at the
six-year degree level shall receive a salary supplement of one hundred
twenty-six dollars ($126.00) per month in addition to the supplement provided
to them as "M" teachers.
Senate Bill 599-Fifth Edition Page 3

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(4) Licensed teachers with licensure based on academic preparation at the
doctoral degree level shall receive a salary supplement of two hundred
fifty-three dollars ($253.00) per month in addition to the supplement provided
to them as "M" teachers.
(5) Certified school nurses shall receive a salary supplement each month of ten
percent (10%) of their monthly salary on the "A" salary schedule.
(6) School counselors who are licensed as counselors at the master's degree level
or higher shall receive a salary supplement each month of one hundred dollars
($100.00).
SECTION 2.1.(c) For school psychologists, school speech pathologists who are
licensed as speech pathologists at the master's degree level or higher, and school audiologists
who are licensed as audiologists at the master's degree level or higher, the following shall apply:
(1) The first step of the salary schedule shall be equivalent to the sixth step of the
"A" salary schedule.
(2) These employees shall receive the following salary supplements each month:
a. Ten percent (10%) of their monthly salary, excluding the supplement
provided pursuant to sub-subdivision b. of this subdivision.
b. Three hundred fifty dollars ($350.00).
(3) These employees are eligible to receive salary supplements equivalent to those
of teachers for academic preparation at the six-year degree level or the
doctoral degree level.
(4) The twenty-sixth step of the salary schedule shall be seven and one-half
percent (7.5%) higher than the salary received by these same employees on
the twenty-fifth step of the salary schedule.
SECTION 2.1.(d) Beginning with the 2014-2015 fiscal year, in lieu of providing
annual longevity payments to teachers paid on the teacher salary schedule, the amounts of those
longevity payments are included in the monthly amounts under the teacher salary schedule.
SECTION 2.1.(e) A teacher compensated in accordance with this salary schedule in
the 2025-2026 school year shall receive an amount equal to the greater of the following:
(1) The applicable amount on the applicable salary schedule for the applicable
school year.
(2) For teachers who were eligible for longevity for the 2013-2014 school year,
the sum of the following:
a. The salary the teacher received in the 2013-2014 school year pursuant
to Section 35.11 of S.L. 2013-360.
b. The longevity that the teacher would have received under the longevity
system in effect for the 2013-2014 school year provided in Section
35.11 of S.L. 2013-360 based on the teacher's current years of service.
c. The annual bonus provided in Section 9.1(e) of S.L. 2014-100.
(3) For teachers who were not eligible for longevity for the 2013-2014 school
year, the sum of the salary and annual bonus the teacher received in the
2014-2015 school year pursuant to Section 9.1 of S.L. 2014-100.
SECTION 2.1.(f) As used in this section, the term "teacher" shall also include
instructional support personnel.

REINSTATE EDUCATION-BASED SALARY SUPPLEMENTS FOR TEACHERS AND
INSTRUCTIONAL SUPPORT PERSONNEL
SECTION 2.2.(a) G.S. 115C-302.10 is repealed.
SECTION 2.2.(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, for the 2025-2026
fiscal year, State Board of Education policy TCP-A-006, as it was in effect on June 30, 2013,
shall be used to determine (i) whether teachers and instructional support personnel are paid on
Page 4 Senate Bill 599-Fifth Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
the "M" salary schedule and (ii) whether they receive a salary supplement for academic
preparation at the six-year or doctoral degree level.

CONSOLIDATED TEACHER BONUS PROGRAM
SECTION 2.3.(a) Establish Consolidated Bonus Program. – The State Board of
Education shall establish a consolidated teacher bonus program for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to
reward teacher performance and encourage student learning and improvement. To attain this
goal, the Department of Public Instruction shall administer bonus pay to qualifying teachers
whose salaries are supported from State funds in January of 2026, based on data from the
2024-2025 school year, in accordance with this section.
SECTION 2.3.(b) Definitions. – For purposes of this section, the following
definitions shall apply:
(1) Eligible advanced course teacher. – A teacher of Advanced Placement
courses, International Baccalaureate Diploma Programme courses, or the
Cambridge Advanced International Certificate of Education (AICE) program
who meets the following criteria:
a. Is employed by, or retired having last held a position at, one or more
of the following:
1. A qualifying public school unit.
2. The North Carolina Virtual Public School program.
b. Taught one or more students who received a score listed in subsection
(c) of this section.
(2) Eligible career and technical education (CTE) teacher. – A teacher who meets
the following criteria:
a. Is employed by, or retired having last held a position at, a qualifying
public school unit.
b. Taught one or more students who attained approved industry
certifications or credentials consistent with G.S. 115C-156.2.
(3) Eligible growth teacher. – A teacher who meets at least one of the following
criteria:
a. Is employed by, or retired having last held a position at, a qualifying
public school unit and meets one of the following criteria:
1. Is in the top twenty-five percent (25%) of teachers in the State
according to the EVAAS student growth index score for third
grade reading from the previous school year.
2. Is in the top twenty-five percent (25%) of teachers in the State
according to the EVAAS student growth index score for fourth
or fifth grade reading from the previous school year.
3. Is in the top twenty-five percent (25%) of teachers in the State
according to the EVAAS student growth index score for fourth,
fifth, sixth, seventh, or eighth grade mathematics from the
previous school year.
b. Is employed by, or retired having last held a position at, a local school
administrative unit and meets one of the following criteria:
1. Is in the top twenty-five percent (25%) of teachers in the
teacher's respective local school administrative unit according
to the EVAAS student growth index score for third grade
reading from the previous school year.
2. Is in the top twenty-five percent (25%) of teachers in the
teacher's respective local school administrative unit according
Senate Bill 599-Fifth Edition Page 5

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
to the EVAAS student growth index score for fourth or fifth
grade reading from the previous school year.
3. Is in the top twenty-five percent (25%) of teachers in the
teacher's respective local school administrative unit according
to the EVAAS student growth index score for fourth, fifth,
sixth, seventh, or eighth grade mathematics from the previous
school year.
c. Was employed by a local school administrative unit that employed in
the previous school year three or fewer total teachers in that teacher's
grade level as long as the teacher has an EVAAS student growth index
score from the previous school year of exceeded expected growth in
one of the following subject areas:
1. Third grade reading.
2. Fourth or fifth grade reading.
3. Fourth, fifth, sixth, seventh, or eighth grade mathematics.
(4) EVAAS. – The Education Value-Added Assessment System.
(5) Qualifying public school unit. – Any of the following:
a. A local school administrative unit.
b. A charter school.
c. A regional school.
d. A school providing elementary or secondary instruction operated by
The University of North Carolina under Article 29A of Chapter 116 of
the General Statutes.
(6) Qualifying teacher. – An eligible teacher who meets one of the following
criteria:
a. Remains employed teaching in the same qualifying public school unit,
or, if an eligible advanced course teacher is only employed by the
North Carolina Virtual Public School program, remains employed
teaching in that program, at least from the school year the data is
collected until January 1 of the corresponding school year that the
bonus is paid.
b. Retired, between the last day of the school year in which the data is
collected and January 1 of the corresponding school year in which the
bonus is paid, after attaining one of the following:
1. The age of at least 65 with five years of creditable service.
2. The age of at least 60 with 25 years of creditable service.
3. Thirty years of creditable service.
SECTION 2.3.(c) Advanced Course Bonuses. – A bonus in the amount of fifty
dollars ($50.00) shall be provided to qualifying advanced course teachers for each student taught
in each advanced course who receives the following score:
(1) For Advanced Placement courses, a score of three or higher on the College
Board Advanced Placement Examination.
(2) For International Baccalaureate Diploma Programme courses, a score of four
or higher on the International Baccalaureate course examination.
(3) For the Cambridge AICE program, a score of "E" or higher on the Cambridge
AICE program examinations.
SECTION 2.3.(d) CTE Bonuses. – For qualifying career and technical education
teachers, bonuses shall be provided in the following amounts:
(1) A bonus in the amount of twenty-five dollars ($25.00) for each student taught
by a teacher who provided instruction in a course that led to the attainment of
Page 6 Senate Bill 599-Fifth Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
an industry certification or credential with a twenty-five dollar ($25.00) value
ranking as determined under subsection (e) of this section.
(2) A bonus in the amount of fifty dollars ($50.00) for each student taught by a
teacher who provided instruction in a course that led to the attainment of an
industry certification or credential with a fifty dollar ($50.00) value ranking
as determined under subsection (e) of this section.
SECTION 2.3.(e) CTE Course Value Ranking. – The Department of Commerce, in
consultation with the State Board, shall assign a value ranking for each industry certification and
credential based on academic rigor and employment value in accordance with this subsection.
Fifty percent (50%) of the ranking shall be based on academic rigor and the remaining fifty
percent (50%) on employment value. Academic rigor and employment value shall be based on
the following elements:
(1) Academic rigor shall be based on the number of instructional hours, including
work experience or internship hours, required to earn the industry certification
or credential, with extra weight given for coursework that also provides
community college credit.
(2) Employment value shall be based on the entry wage, growth rate in
employment for each occupational category, and average annual openings for
the primary occupation linked with the industry certification or credential.
SECTION 2.3.(f) Statewide Growth Bonuses. – Of the funds appropriated for the
program, bonuses shall be provided to qualifying teachers who are eligible teachers under
sub-subdivision a. of subdivision (3) of subsection (b) of this section, as follows:
(1) The sum of five million dollars ($5,000,000) shall be allocated for bonuses to
eligible teachers under sub-sub-subdivision a.1. of subdivision (3) of
subsection (b) of this section. These funds shall be distributed equally among
qualifying teachers.
(2) A bonus in the amount of two thousand dollars ($2,000) shall be awarded to
each qualifying teacher who is an eligible teacher under sub-sub-subdivision
a.2. of subdivision (3) of subsection (b) of this section.
(3) A bonus in the amount of two thousand dollars ($2,000) shall be awarded to
each qualifying teacher who is an eligible teacher under sub-sub-subdivision
a.3. of subdivision (3) of subsection (b) of this section.
SECTION 2.3.(g) Local Growth Bonuses. – Of the funds appropriated for the
program, bonuses shall be provided to eligible teachers under sub-subdivisions b. and c. of
subdivision (3) of subsection (b) of this section, as follows:
(1) The sum of five million dollars ($5,000,000) shall be allocated for bonuses to
eligible EVAAS teachers under sub-sub-subdivisions b.1. and c.1. of
subdivision (3) of subsection (b) of this section. These funds shall be divided
proportionally based on average daily membership in third grade for each
local school administrative unit and then distributed equally among qualifying
third grade reading teachers in each local school administrative unit.
(2) A bonus in the amount of two thousand dollars ($2,000) shall be awarded to
each qualifying teacher who is an eligible teacher under sub-sub-subdivision
b.2. or c.2. of subdivision (3) of subsection (b) of this section.
(3) A bonus in the amount of two thousand dollars ($2,000) shall be awarded to
each qualifying teacher who is an eligible teacher under sub-sub-subdivision
b.3. or c.3. of subdivision (3) of subsection (b) of this section.
SECTION 2.3.(h) Limitations and Other Criteria. – The following additional
limitations and other criteria shall apply to the program:
(1) Bonus funds awarded to a teacher pursuant to subsection (c), subsection (d),
subdivision (1) of subsection (f), and subdivision (1) of subsection (g) of this
Senate Bill 599-Fifth Edition Page 7

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
section shall not exceed three thousand five hundred dollars ($3,500) per
subsection or subdivision in any given school year.
(2) A qualifying teacher who is an eligible teacher under sub-sub-subdivision a.1.,
b.1., or c.1. of subdivision (3) of subsection (b) of this section may receive a
bonus under both subdivision (1) of subsection (f) and subdivision (1) of
subsection (g) of this section but shall not receive more than seven thousand
dollars ($7,000) pursuant to subdivision (1) of subsection (f) and subdivision
(1) of subsection (g) of this section in any given school year.
(3) A qualifying teacher who is an eligible teacher under sub-sub-subdivision a.2.,
b.2., or c.2. of subdivision (3) of subsection (b) of this section may receive a
bonus under both subdivision (2) of subsection (f) and subdivision (2) of
subsection (g) of this section but shall not receive more than two bonuses
pursuant to subdivision (2) of subsection (f) and subdivision (2) of subsection
(g) of this section in any given school year.
(4) A qualifying teacher who is an eligible teacher under sub-sub-subdivision a.3.,
b.3., or c.3. of subdivision (3) of subsection (b) of this section may receive a
bonus under both subdivision (3) of subsection (f) and subdivision (3) of
subsection (g) of this section but shall not receive more than two bonuses
pursuant to subdivision (3) of subsection (f) and subdivision (3) of subsection
(g) of this section in any given school year.
SECTION 2.3.(i) Bonuses Not Compensation. – Bonuses awarded to a teacher
pursuant to this section shall be in addition to any regular wage or other bonus the teacher receives
or is scheduled to receive. Notwithstanding G.S. 135-1(7a), the bonuses awarded under this
section are not compensation under Article 1 of Chapter 135 of the General Statutes, Retirement
System for Teachers and State Employees.
SECTION 2.3.(j) Study and Report. – The State Board of Education shall study the
effect of the program on teacher performance and retention. The State Board shall report the
results of its findings and the amount of bonuses awarded to the President Pro Tempore of the
Senate, the Speaker of the House of Representatives, the Joint Legislative Education Oversight
Committee, and the Fiscal Research Division by March 15, 2026. The report shall include, at a
minimum, the following information:
(1) Number of students enrolled and taking examinations in each of the following
categories of courses:
a. Advanced Placement.
b. International Baccalaureate Diploma Programme.
c. Cambridge AICE program.
d. Courses needed for the attainment of an industry certification or
credential.
(2) Number of students receiving outcomes on examinations resulting in the
award of a bonus for a teacher in each category of courses identified in
sub-subdivision a. of subdivision (1) of this subsection.
(3) Number of teachers receiving a bonus in each category of courses identified
in sub-subdivision a. of subdivision (1) of this subsection.
(4) The amounts awarded to teachers for each category of courses identified in
sub-subdivision a. of subdivision (1) of this subsection.
(5) The type of industry certifications and credentials earned by the students, the
value ranking for each certification and credential, the number of bonuses
earned for each certification or credential, and the total bonus amount awarded
for each certification or credential.
Page 8 Senate Bill 599-Fifth Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(6) Average bonus amount awarded to each qualifying teacher who is an eligible
teacher under sub-sub-subdivision a.1., b.1., or c.1. of subdivision (3) of
subsection (b) of this section.
(7) The percentage of teachers who received a bonus pursuant to this section and
were eligible to receive a bonus for teaching in the same grade level or course
in January 2022 or January 2023, or both, where applicable, pursuant to one
of the following programs:
a. The Advanced Course and CTE Bonus Program provided in Section
7A.4 of S.L. 2021-180.
b. The Growth-Based Teacher Bonus Program provided in Section 7A.2
of S.L. of 2022-74.
(8) The percentage of teachers who received a bonus pursuant to this section and
received a bonus for teaching in the same grade level or course in either
January 2022 or January 2023 pursuant to one of the programs listed in
subdivision (7) of this subsection.
(9) The percentage of teachers who received a bonus pursuant to this section and
received a bonus for teaching in the same grade level or course in January
2022 or January 2023, or both, where applicable, pursuant to one of the
programs listed subdivision (7) of this subsection.
(10) The statistical relationship between a teacher receiving a bonus in January
2026 pursuant to this section and receiving a bonus pursuant to a predecessor
bonus program. For purposes of this subdivision, the following are
predecessor programs:
a. Bonuses awarded pursuant to Section 7A.4(c) of S.L. 2021-180 are
predecessors to bonuses awarded pursuant to subsection (c) of this
section.
b. Bonuses awarded pursuant to Section 7A.4(d) of S.L. 2021-180 are
predecessors to bonuses awarded pursuant to subsection (d) of this
section.
c. Bonuses awarded pursuant to subdivision (1) of subsection (c) and
subdivision (1) of subsection (d) of Section 7A.2 of S.L. 2022-74 are
predecessors to bonuses awarded pursuant to subdivision (1) of
subsection (f) and subdivision (1) of subsection (g) of this section.
d. Bonuses awarded pursuant to subdivision (2) of subsection (c) and
subdivision (2) of subsection (d) of Section 7A.2 of S.L. 2022-74 are
predecessors to bonuses awarded pursuant to subdivision (2) of
subsection (f) and subdivision (2) of subsection (g) of this section.
e. Bonuses awarded pursuant to subdivision (c)(3) and subdivision (d)(3)
of Section 7A.2 of S.L. 2022-74 are predecessors to bonuses awarded
pursuant to subdivision (3) of subsection (f) and subdivision (3) of
subsection (g) of this section.
f. Bonuses awarded pursuant to the Consolidated Teacher Bonus
Program provided in Section 7A.3 of S.L. 2023-134.
(11) The distribution of statewide and local growth bonuses awarded pursuant to
this section as among qualifying public school units and, where applicable,
schools within those units.

SUPPLEMENTAL FUNDS FOR TEACHER COMPENSATION
SECTION 2.4.(a) Use of Funds. – For the 2025-2026 fiscal year, except as provided
in subsection (g) of this section, the State Board of Education shall allocate funds pursuant to this
section to eligible local school administrative units to provide salary supplements to teachers and
Senate Bill 599-Fifth Edition Page 9

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
qualifying school administrators in those units. Allocation of salary supplements among teachers
and qualifying school administrators within each eligible local school administrative unit,
including whether a teacher or qualifying school administrator receives a salary supplement and
the amount of the supplement provided to that person, shall be determined in the discretion of
the local board of education of the eligible unit, except that no individual salary supplement shall
exceed the per teacher funding amount awarded to that unit pursuant to subdivision (4) of
subsection (c) of this section.
SECTION 2.4.(b) Definitions. – As used in this section, the following definitions
shall apply:
(1) Adjusted market value of taxable real property. – A county's assessed taxable
real property value, using the latest available data published by the
Department of Revenue, divided by the county's sales assessment ratio
determined under G.S. 105-289(h).
(2) Composite value. – For each eligible county, the sum of the following:
a. The taxable real property factor multiplied by sixty-five percent
(65%).
b. The median household income factor multiplied by twenty-five
percent (25%).
c. The effective tax rate factor multiplied by ten percent (10%).
(3) County allocation factor. – For each eligible county, the supplement factor for
that county divided by the sum of all supplement factors for the State.
(4) Effective tax rate. – The actual county tax rate multiplied by the most recent
annual sales assessment ratio for that county.
(5) Effective tax rate factor. – For each eligible county, the effective tax rate for
that county divided by the median effective tax rate in the State.
(6) Eligible county. – A county that has an adjusted market value of taxable real
property of less than sixty-three billion dollars ($63,000,000,000).
(7) Eligible local school administrative unit. – A local school administrative unit
located in whole or in part in an eligible county.
(8) Eligible school. – A public school that is located in an eligible county and
governed by a local school administrative unit.
(9) Maintenance of effort amount. – For each local school administrative unit in
each fiscal year, the supplant factor multiplied by the total State and non-State
funds expended for salaries for teachers from the fiscal year for which the
most recent salary data are available.
(10) Median household income. – A county's median household income for the
most recent 12 months for which data are available, as that term is used in
G.S. 143B-437.08.
(11) Median household income factor. – For each eligible county, the median
household income in the State divided by the median household income for
that county.
(12) Non-State funds. – Any funds held by a local school administrative unit, other
than nonrecurring federal funds received as a result of legislation enacted by
Congress in response to COVID-19, that are not State funds.
(13) Qualifying school administrator. – Any of the following:
a. Assistant principals paid pursuant to G.S. 115C-285(a)(8).
b. Principals paid pursuant to G.S. 115C-285(a)(8a).
(14) Supplant factor. – For each local school administrative unit in each fiscal year
of the fiscal biennium, the total non-State funds expended for salary
supplements for teachers in the 2020-2021 fiscal year divided by the total
Page 10 Senate Bill 599-Fifth Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
State and non-State funds expended for salaries for teachers in the 2020-2021
fiscal year.
(15) Supplement factor. – For each eligible county, the composite value multiplied
by the number of State-funded teachers employed in a school in the county
that is governed by a local school administrative unit.
(16) Taxable real property factor. – For each eligible county, the median adjusted
market value of taxable real property in the State divided by the adjusted
market value of taxable real property for that county.
(17) Teacher. – Teachers and instructional support personnel.
SECTION 2.4.(c) Allocation of Funds. – The State Board of Education shall allocate
funds for salary supplements to eligible local school administrative units according to the
following procedure:
(1) County allocation. – For each eligible county, the State Board shall determine
a county allocation by multiplying the county allocation factor for that county
by the funding amount appropriated pursuant to this section for the applicable
fiscal year.
(2) Per teacher funding amount. – For each eligible county, the State Board shall
determine a per teacher funding amount by dividing the county allocation
amounts determined pursuant to subdivision (1) of this subsection by the total
number of State-funded teachers employed in all eligible schools in that
county.
(3) Unit funding amount. – For each eligible local school administrative unit, the
State Board shall determine the funding amount for that unit based on the per
teacher funding amount or amounts for the eligible county or counties where
the unit is located. For each county with an eligible school governed by the
unit, the State Board shall multiply the applicable per teacher funding amount
for that county determined pursuant to subdivision (2) of this subsection by
the number of State-funded teachers employed in the eligible school in that
county. If the unit is located in multiple eligible counties, the State Board shall
aggregate those amounts.
(4) Allocation and funding cap. – The State Board shall allocate the amount
determined pursuant to subdivision (3) of this subsection to each eligible local
school administrative unit for each applicable fiscal year, up to a maximum of
five thousand dollars ($5,000) per State-funded teacher.
SECTION 2.4.(d) Charter Schools. – Funds appropriated to the Department of
Public Instruction pursuant to this section shall be subject to the allocation of funds for charter
schools described in G.S. 115C-218.105. The General Assembly encourages charter schools
receiving funds pursuant to this section to provide salary supplements to teachers and qualifying
school administrators in the charter school in accordance with the requirements of this section.
SECTION 2.4.(e) Formula for Distribution of Supplemental Funding Pursuant to
this Section Only. – The formula in this section is solely a basis for distribution of supplemental
funding to eligible local school administrative units and is not intended to reflect any measure of
the adequacy of the educational program or funding for public schools. The formula is also not
intended to reflect any commitment by the General Assembly to appropriate any additional
supplemental funds for eligible local school administrative units.
SECTION 2.4.(f) Nonsupplant Requirement. – A local school administrative unit
that receives funds under this section shall use those funds to supplement non-State funds
provided for salary supplements for teachers and qualifying school administrators and shall not
use any State funds, including funds received under this section, Section 7A.4 of S.L. 2023-134,
or Section 7A.12 of S.L. 2021-180, to supplant non-State funds provided for salary supplements
for teachers and qualifying school administrators. For purposes of this section, a local school
Senate Bill 599-Fifth Edition Page 11

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
administrative unit has supplanted non-State funds if the State Board finds that the amount of
non-State funds expended by the unit for salary supplements was less than ninety-five percent
(95%) of the maintenance of effort amount for the local school administrative unit.
SECTION 2.4.(g) Nonsupplant Enforcement. – The State Board of Education shall
not allocate any funds under this section to a local school administrative unit if it determines that
the unit has supplanted non-State funds in violation of subsection (f) of this section.
SECTION 2.4.(h) Reports. – No later than April 15, 2026, the State Board of
Education shall report the following information for the applicable fiscal year to the Joint
Legislative Education Oversight Committee and the Fiscal Research Division:
(1) A list of all eligible counties and eligible local school administrative units.
(2) Funds allocated to each eligible local school administrative unit.
(3) The percentage and amount of teachers and qualifying school administrators
in each eligible local school administrative unit receiving salary supplements.
(4) The average salary supplement amount in each eligible local school
administrative unit.
(5) The range of salary supplement amounts in each eligible local school
administrative unit.
(6) The effect of the salary supplements on the retention of teachers and
qualifying school administrators in eligible local school administrative units.
(7) The identity of any local school administrative unit that the State Board
determines has supplanted funds.

PRINCIPAL SALARY SCHEDULE
SECTION 2.5.(a) The following annual salary schedule for principals shall apply
for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, beginning July 1, 2025:
2025-2026 Principal Annual Salary Schedule
Avg. Daily Membership Base Met Growth Exceeded Growth
0-200 $79,737 $87,709 $95,684
201-400 $83,723 $92,095 $100,467
401-700 $87,709 $96,481 $105,252
701-1,000 $91,698 $100,866 $110,037
1,001-1,600 $95,684 $105,252 $114,821
1,601+ $99,670 $109,637 $119,604
A principal's placement on the salary schedule shall be determined according to the
average daily membership of the school supervised by the principal, as described in subsection
(b) of this section, and the school growth scores, calculated pursuant to G.S. 115C-83.15(c), for
each school the principal supervised in at least two of the prior three school years, as described
in subsection (c) of this section, regardless of a break in service, and provided the principal
supervised each school as a principal for at least a majority of the school year, as follows:
(1) A principal shall be paid according to the Exceeded Growth column of the
schedule if the school growth scores show the school or schools exceeded
expected growth in at least two of the prior three school years.
(2) A principal shall be paid according to the Met Growth column of the schedule
if any of the following apply:
a. The school growth scores show the school or schools met expected
growth in at least two of the prior three school years.
b. The school growth scores show the school or schools met expected
growth in at least one of the prior three school years and exceeded
expected growth in one of the prior three school years.
c. The principal supervised a school in at least two of the prior three
school years that was not eligible to receive a school growth score.
Page 12 Senate Bill 599-Fifth Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(3) A principal shall be paid according to the Base column if any of the following
apply:
a. The school growth scores show the school or schools did not meet
expected growth in at least two of the prior three school years.
b. The principal has not supervised any school as a principal for a
majority of the school year in at least two of the prior three school
years.
SECTION 2.5.(b) For purposes of determining the average daily membership of a
principal's school, the allotted average daily membership for the school for the applicable school
year shall be used. For purposes of this section, the allotted average daily membership of a
principal's school shall include any prekindergarten students in membership at that school.
SECTION 2.5.(c) For purposes of determining the school growth scores for each
school the principal supervised in one or more prior school years, the following school growth
scores shall be used during the following time periods:
(1) For the first six months of the applicable fiscal year, the school growth scores
from the first, second, and third years.
(2) For the second six months of the applicable fiscal year, the school growth
scores from the second, third, and fourth years.
(3) If a principal does not have a school growth score from any of the school years
identified in this subsection, the most recent available growth scores, up to the
fourth year, shall be used.
SECTION 2.5.(d) Beginning with the 2017-2018 fiscal year, in lieu of providing
annual longevity payments to principals paid on the principal salary schedule, the amounts of
those longevity payments are included in the annual amounts under the principal salary schedule.
SECTION 2.5.(e) A principal compensated in accordance with this section for the
2025-2026 fiscal year shall receive an amount equal to the greater of the following:
(1) The applicable amount on the principal salary schedule for the applicable
fiscal year.
(2) For principals who were eligible for longevity in the 2016-2017 fiscal year,
the sum of the following:
a. The salary the principal received in the 2016-2017 fiscal year pursuant
to Section 9.1 or Section 9.2 of S.L. 2016-94.
b. The longevity that the principal would have received as provided for
State employees under the North Carolina Human Resources Act for
the 2016-2017 fiscal year based on the principal's current years of
service.
(3) For principals who were not eligible for longevity in the 2016-2017 fiscal
year, the salary the principal received in the 2016-2017 fiscal year pursuant to
Section 9.1 or Section 9.2 of S.L. 2016-94.
SECTION 2.5.(f) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:
(1) First year. – The school year immediately preceding the second year.
(2) Fourth year. – The school year immediately preceding the applicable school
year.
(3) Second year. – The school year immediately preceding the third year.
(4) The applicable fiscal year. – The 2025-2026 fiscal year.
(5) The applicable school year. – The 2025-2026 school year.
(6) Third year. – The school year immediately preceding the fourth year.

BONUSES FOR PRINCIPALS
SECTION 2.6.(a) The Department of Public Instruction shall administer a bonus in
the 2025-2026 fiscal year to any principal who supervised a school as a principal for a majority
Senate Bill 599-Fifth Edition Page 13

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
of the previous school year if that school was in the top fifty percent (50%) of school growth in
the State during the previous school year, calculated by the State Board pursuant to
G.S. 115C-83.15(c), as follows:
2025-2026 Principal Bonus Schedule
Statewide Growth Percentage Bonus
Top 5% $15,000
Top 10% $10,000
Top 15% $5,000
Top 20% $2,500
Top 50% $1,000
A principal shall receive no more than one bonus pursuant to this subsection. The
bonus shall be paid at the highest amount for which the principal qualifies.
SECTION 2.6.(b) The bonus awarded pursuant to this section shall be in addition to
any regular wage or other bonus the principal receives or is scheduled to receive.
SECTION 2.6.(c) Notwithstanding G.S. 135-1(7a), the bonuses awarded pursuant
to this section are not compensation under Article 1 of Chapter 135 of the General Statutes,
Retirement System for Teachers and State Employees.
SECTION 2.6.(d) It is the intent of the General Assembly that funds provided
pursuant to this section will supplement principal compensation and not supplant local funds.
SECTION 2.6.(e) The bonus provided pursuant to this section shall be paid no later
than October 31, 2025, to qualifying principals employed as of October 1, 2025.

ASSISTANT PRINCIPAL SALARIES
SECTION 2.7.(a) For the 2025-2026 fiscal year, beginning July 1, 2025, assistant
principals shall receive a monthly salary based on the salary schedule for teachers who are
classified as "A" teachers plus nineteen percent (19%). An assistant principal shall be placed on
the step on the salary schedule that reflects the total number of years of experience as a certified
employee of the public schools. For purposes of this section, an administrator with a one-year
provisional assistant principal's certificate shall be considered equivalent to an assistant principal.
SECTION 2.7.(b) Assistant principals with certification based on academic
preparation at the six-year degree level shall be paid a salary supplement of one hundred
twenty-six dollars ($126.00) per month and at the doctoral degree level shall be paid a salary
supplement of two hundred fifty-three dollars ($253.00) per month.
SECTION 2.7.(c) Participants in an approved full-time master's in school
administration program shall receive up to a 10-month stipend during the internship period of the
master's program. The stipend shall be at the beginning salary of an assistant principal or, for a
teacher who becomes an intern, at least as much as that person would earn as a teacher on the
teacher salary schedule. The North Carolina Principal Fellows Program or the school of education
where the intern participates in a full-time master's in school administration program shall supply
the Department of Public Instruction with certification of eligible full-time interns.
SECTION 2.7.(d) Beginning with the 2017-2018 fiscal year, in lieu of providing
annual longevity payments to assistant principals on the assistant principal salary schedule, the
amounts of those longevity payments are included in the monthly amounts provided to assistant
principals pursuant to subsection (a) of this section.
SECTION 2.7.(e) An assistant principal compensated in accordance with this section
for the 2025-2026 fiscal year shall receive an amount equal to the greater of the following:
(1) The applicable amount on the salary schedule for the applicable year.
(2) For assistant principals who were eligible for longevity in the 2016-2017 fiscal
year, the sum of the following:
a. The salary the assistant principal received in the 2016-2017 fiscal year
pursuant to Section 9.1 or Section 9.2 of S.L. 2016-94.
Page 14 Senate Bill 599-Fifth Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
b. The longevity that the assistant principal would have received as
provided for State employees under the North Carolina Human
Resources Act for the 2016-2017 fiscal year based on the assistant
principal's current years of service.
(3) For assistant principals who were not eligible for longevity in the 2016-2017
fiscal year, the salary the assistant principal received in the 2016-2017 fiscal
year pursuant to Section 9.1 or Section 9.2 of S.L. 2016-94.

CENTRAL OFFICE SALARIES
SECTION 2.8.(a) For the 2025-2026 fiscal year, beginning July 1, 2025, the annual
salary for superintendents, assistant superintendents, associate superintendents,
directors/coordinators, supervisors, and finance officers whose salaries are supported from State
funds shall be increased by two and one-half percent (2.5%).
SECTION 2.8.(b) The monthly salary maximums that follow apply to assistant
superintendents, associate superintendents, directors/coordinators, supervisors, and finance
officers for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, beginning July 1, 2025:
2025-2026 Fiscal Year
Maximum
School Administrator I $7,762
School Administrator II $8,225
School Administrator III $8,715
School Administrator IV $9,055
School Administrator V $9,417
School Administrator VI $9,974
School Administrator VII $10,373
The local board of education shall determine the appropriate category and placement
for each assistant superintendent, associate superintendent, director/coordinator, supervisor, or
finance officer within the maximums and within funds appropriated by the General Assembly
for central office administrators and superintendents. The category in which an employee is
placed shall be included in the contract of any employee.
SECTION 2.8.(c) The monthly salary maximums that follow apply to
superintendents for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, beginning July 1, 2025:
2025-2026 Fiscal Year
Maximum
Superintendent I $10,995
Superintendent II $11,650
Superintendent III $12,350
Superintendent IV $13,092
Superintendent V $13,880
The local board of education shall determine the appropriate category and placement
for the superintendent based on the average daily membership of the local school administrative
unit and within funds appropriated by the General Assembly for central office administrators and
superintendents.
SECTION 2.8.(d) Longevity pay for superintendents, assistant superintendents,
associate superintendents, directors/coordinators, supervisors, and finance officers shall be as
provided for State employees under the North Carolina Human Resources Act.
SECTION 2.8.(e) Superintendents, assistant superintendents, associate
superintendents, directors/coordinators, supervisors, and finance officers with certification based
on academic preparation at the six-year degree level shall receive a salary supplement of one
hundred twenty-six dollars ($126.00) per month in addition to the compensation provided
pursuant to this section. Superintendents, assistant superintendents, associate superintendents,
Senate Bill 599-Fifth Edition Page 15

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
directors/coordinators, supervisors, and finance officers with certification based on academic
preparation at the doctoral degree level shall receive a salary supplement of two hundred
fifty-three dollars ($253.00) per month in addition to the compensation provided for under this
section.
SECTION 2.8.(f) The State Board of Education shall not permit local school
administrative units to transfer State funds from other funding categories for salaries for public
school central office administrators.

NONCERTIFIED PERSONNEL SALARIES
SECTION 2.9. For the 2025-2026 fiscal year, beginning July 1, 2025, the annual
salary for noncertified public school employees whose salaries are supported from State funds
shall be increased as follows:
(1) For permanent, full-time employees on a 12-month contract, by two and
one-half percent (2.5%).
(2) For the following employees, by an equitable amount based on the amount
specified in subdivision (1) of this section:
a. Permanent, full-time employees on a contract for fewer than 12
months.
b. Permanent, part-time employees.
c. Temporary and permanent hourly employees.

PART III. SALARY AND BENEFITS INCREASES

ELIGIBLE STATE-FUNDED EMPLOYEES AWARDED LEGISLATIVE SALARY
INCREASES
SECTION 3.3.(a) Effective July 1, 2025, except as provided by subsection (b) of
this section, a person (i) whose salary is set by this Part, pursuant to the North Carolina Human
Resources Act, or as otherwise authorized in this act and (ii) who is employed in a State-funded
position on June 30, 2025, is awarded a legislative salary increase in the 2025-2026 fiscal year,
as follows:
(1) A cost-of-living adjustment in the amount of two and one half percent (2.5%)
for State employees.
(2) An additional cost-of-living adjustment in the amount of ten and one-half
percent (10.5%) for sworn State law enforcement officers.
(3) Any other salary adjustment otherwise allowed or provided by law.
SECTION 3.3.(b) Effective July 1, 2025, the following persons are not eligible to
receive the legislative salary increases provided by subsection (a) of this section:
(1) Employees of local boards of education.
(2) Local community college employees.
(3) Employees of The University of North Carolina.
(4) Clerks of superior court compensated under G.S. 7A-101.
(5) Officers and employees to which Section 3.15 of this Part applies.
(6) Officers and employees to which Section 3.16 of this Part applies.
(7) Officers and employees to which Section 3.18 of this Part applies.
(8) Employees of schools operated by the Department of Health and Human
Services, the Department of Public Safety, the Department of Adult
Correction, the Governor Morehead School for the Blind, the Eastern North
Carolina School for the Deaf, the North Carolina School for the Deaf, and the
State Board of Education who are paid based on the Teacher Salary Schedule.
Page 16 Senate Bill 599-Fifth Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 3.3.(c) The additional increases awarded to sworn State law enforcement
officers includes increases for officers serving in the executive, legislative, or judicial branches,
or employed by The University of North Carolina or its constituent institutions.
SECTION 3.3.(d) Part-time employees shall receive the increases authorized by this
section on a prorated and equitable basis.
SECTION 3.3.(e) No eligible State-funded employee shall be prohibited from
receiving the full salary increases provided in this section solely because the employee's salary
after applying the legislative salary increase is above the maximum of the salary range prescribed
by the State Human Resources Commission.

GOVERNOR AND COUNCIL OF STATE
SECTION 3.4.(a) Effective July 1, 2025, G.S. 147-11(a) reads as rewritten:
"§ 147-11. Salary and expense allowance of Governor; allowance to person designated to
represent Governor's office.
(a) The salary of the Governor shall be two hundred three thousand seventy-three dollars
($203,073) two hundred eight thousand one hundred fifty dollars ($208,150) annually, payable
monthly."
SECTION 3.4.(b) Effective July 1, 2025, the annual salaries for members of the
Council of State, payable monthly, are set as follows:
Council of State Annual Salary
Lieutenant Governor $172,594
Attorney General 172,594
Secretary of State 172,594
State Treasurer 172,594
State Auditor 172,594
Superintendent of Public Instruction 172,594
Agriculture Commissioner 172,594
Insurance Commissioner 172,594
Labor Commissioner 172,594

CERTAIN EXECUTIVE BRANCH OFFICIALS
SECTION 3.5. Effective July 1, 2025, the annual salaries, payable monthly, for the
following executive branch officials are as follows:

Executive Branch Officials Annual Salary
Chairman, Alcoholic Beverage Control Commission $144,365
State Controller 201,022
Commissioner of Banks 162,028
Chair, Board of Review, Division of Employment Security 158,931
Members, Board of Review, Division of Employment Security 156,989
Chairman, Parole Commission 158,931
Full-time Members of the Parole Commission 146,948
Chairman, Utilities Commission 180,159
Members of the Utilities Commission 162,028
Executive Director, North Carolina Agricultural Finance Authority 140,590
State Fire Marshal 142,526

JUDICIAL BRANCH
SECTION 3.6.(a) Effective July 1, 2025, the annual salaries, payable monthly, for
the following judicial branch officials are as follows:
Judicial Branch Officials Annual Salary
Senate Bill 599-Fifth Edition Page 17

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
Chief Justice, Supreme Court $208,150
Associate Justice, Supreme Court 202,747
Chief Judge, Court of Appeals 199,541
Judge, Court of Appeals 194,362
Judge, Senior Regular Resident Superior Court 178,606
Judge, Superior Court 173,353
Chief Judge, District Court 171,737
Judge, District Court 166,686
Chief Administrative Law Judge 148,354
District Attorney 171,520
Assistant Administrative Officer of the Courts 155,610
Public Defender 171,520
Director of Indigent Defense Services 172,779
SECTION 3.6.(b) The district attorney of a judicial district, with the approval of the
Administrative Officer of the Courts, and the public defender of a judicial district, with the
approval of the Commission on Indigent Defense Services, shall set the salaries of assistant
district attorneys and assistant public defenders in that district such that the average salary of
those assistants in that district does not exceed one hundred three thousand eight hundred
thirty-one dollars ($103,831) and the minimum salary of any assistant is at least fifty-five
thousand seven hundred twenty-eight dollars ($55,728), effective July 1, 2025.

CLERKS OF SUPERIOR COURT
SECTION 3.7. Effective July 1, 2025, G.S. 7A-101(a) reads as rewritten:
"§ 7A-101. Compensation.
(a) The clerk of superior court is a full-time employee of the State and shall receive an
annual salary, payable in equal monthly installments, based on the number of State-funded
assistant and deputy clerks of court as determined by the Administrative Office of Court's
workload formula, according to the following schedule:
Assistants and Deputies Annual Salary
0-19 $111,726$114,519
20-29 123,488126,575
30-49 135,248138,629
50-99 147,010150,685
100 and above 149,949153,698
If the number of State-funded assistant and deputy clerks of court as determined by the
Administrative Office of Court's workload formula changes, the salary of the clerk shall be
changed, on July 1 of the fiscal year for which the change is reported, to the salary appropriate
for that new number, except that the salary of an incumbent clerk shall not be decreased by any
change in that number during the clerk's continuance in office."

ASSISTANT AND DEPUTY CLERKS OF COURT
SECTION 3.8. Effective July 1, 2025, G.S. 7A-102(c1) reads as rewritten:
"(c1) A full-time assistant clerk or a full-time deputy clerk, and up to one full-time deputy
clerk serving as head bookkeeper per county, shall be paid an annual salary subject to the
following minimum and maximum rates:

Assistant Clerks and Head Bookkeeper Annual Salary
Minimum $40,482$41,494
Maximum 74,79276,662

Deputy Clerks Annual Salary
Page 18 Senate Bill 599-Fifth Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
Minimum $36,315$37,223
Maximum 58,74060,209"

MAGISTRATES
SECTION 3.9. Effective July 1, 2025, G.S. 7A-171.1(a)(1) reads as rewritten:
"(1) A full-time magistrate shall be paid the annual salary indicated in the table set
out in this subdivision. A full-time magistrate is a magistrate who is assigned
to work an average of not less than 40 hours a week during the term of office.
The Administrative Officer of the Courts shall designate whether a magistrate
is full-time. Initial appointment shall be at the entry rate. A magistrate's salary
shall increase to the next step every two years on the anniversary of the date
the magistrate was originally appointed for increases to Steps 1 through 3, and
every four years on the anniversary of the date the magistrate was originally
appointed for increases to Steps 4 through 6:
Table of Salaries of Full-Time Magistrates
Step Level Annual Salary
Entry Rate $47,228$48,409
Step 1 $50,714$51,982
Step 2 $54,475$55,837
Step 3 $58,457$59,918
Step 4 $63,228$64,809
Step 5 $68,973$70,694
Step 6 $75,415.$77,300."

LEGISLATIVE EMPLOYEES
SECTION 3.10.(a) Effective July 1, 2025, the annual salaries of the Legislative
Services Officer and of nonelected employees of the General Assembly in effect on June 30,
2025, shall be legislatively increased by two and one-half percent (2.5%).
SECTION 3.10.(b) Nothing in this act limits any of the provisions of G.S. 120-32.

GENERAL ASSEMBLY PRINCIPAL CLERKS
SECTION 3.11. Effective July 1, 2025, G.S. 120-37(c) reads as rewritten:
"(c) The principal clerks shall be full-time officers. Each principal clerk shall be entitled
to other benefits available to permanent legislative employees and shall be paid an annual salary
of one hundred thirty-three thousand nine hundred thirty-six dollars ($133,936), one hundred
thirty-seven thousand two hundred eighty-four dollars ($137,284), payable monthly. Each
principal clerk shall also receive such additional compensation as approved by the Speaker of the
House of Representatives or the President Pro Tempore of the Senate, respectively, for additional
employment duties beyond those provided by the rules of their House. The Legislative Services
Commission shall review the salary of the principal clerks prior to submission of the proposed
operating budget of the General Assembly to the Governor and shall make appropriate
recommendations for changes in those salaries. Any changes enacted by the General Assembly
shall be by amendment to this paragraph.subsection."

SERGEANTS-AT-ARMS AND READING CLERKS
SECTION 3.12. Effective July 1, 2025, G.S. 120-37(b) reads as rewritten:
"(b) The sergeant at arms and the reading clerk in each house shall be paid a salary of five
hundred twenty-eight dollars ($528.00) five hundred forty-one dollars ($541.00) per week plus
subsistence at the same daily rate provided for members of the General Assembly, plus mileage
at the rate provided for members of the General Assembly for one round trip only from their
homes to Raleigh and return. The sergeants at arms shall serve during sessions of the General
Senate Bill 599-Fifth Edition Page 19

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
Assembly and at such time prior to the convening of, and subsequent to adjournment or recess
of, sessions as may be authorized by the Legislative Services Commission. The reading clerks
shall serve during sessions only."

COMMUNITY COLLEGES
SECTION 3.13.(a) Effective July 1, 2025, the State Board of Community Colleges
shall provide community college faculty and non-faculty personnel with an across-the-board
salary increase in the amount of two and one-half percent (2.5%).
SECTION 3.13.(b) Effective July 1, 2025, the minimum salaries for nine-month,
full-time curriculum community college faculty are as follows:
Educational Level Minimum Salary
Vocational Diploma/Certificate or Less $44,198
Associate Degree or Equivalent 44,813
Bachelor's Degree 47,479
Master's Degree or Education Specialist 49,845
Doctoral Degree 53,255
SECTION 3.13.(c) No full-time faculty member shall earn less than the minimum
salary for the faculty member's education level. The pro rata hourly rate of the minimum salary
for each education level shall be used to determine the minimum salary for part-time faculty
members.

UNIVERSITY OF NORTH CAROLINA
SECTION 3.14. Effective July 1, 2025, the Board of Governors of The University
of North Carolina shall provide SHRA employees, EHRA employees, and teachers employed by
the North Carolina School of Science and Mathematics with an across-the-board salary increase
in the amount of two and one-half percent (2.5%).

CORRECTIONAL OFFICERS/YOUTH COUNSELORS/YOUTH COUNSELOR
TECHNICIANS/YOUTH SERVICES BEHAVIORAL SPECIALISTS – SALARY
SCHEDULE
SECTION 3.15.(a) Effective July 1. 2025, State employees serving as correctional
officers in the Department of Adult Correction shall be compensated at a specific pay rate on the
basis of a salary schedule determined according to the duration of the employee's correctional
officer work experience pursuant to the salary schedule in subsection (b) of this section.
SECTION 3.15.(a1) Effective July 1, 2025, State employees serving in the
Department of Public Safety, Division of Juvenile Justice and Delinquency Prevention, shall be
compensated at a specific pay rate set on the basis of a salary schedule determined according to
the duration of the employee's work experience, as follows:
(1) Youth Counselor Technicians shall be paid under the Correctional Officer I
salary schedule, as established in subsection (b) of this section.
(2) Youth Services Behavioral Specialists shall be paid under the Correctional
Officer II salary schedule, as established in subsection (b) of this section.
(3) Youth Counselors shall be paid under the Correctional Officer III salary
schedule, as established in subsection (b) of this section.
SECTION 3.15.(b) Effective July 1, 2025, the following annual salary schedule will
apply for the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium under subsections (a) and (a1) of this section:

Experience COI COII COIII

0 $42,512 $43,911 $46,961
1 $45,486 $46,983 $50,249
Page 20 Senate Bill 599-Fifth Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
2 $48,217 $49,852 $53,265
3 $50,627 $52,293 $55,928
4 $52,651 $54,385 $58,164
5 $54,232 $56,015 $59,909
6+ $55,317 57,136 $61,108

SECTION 3.15.(c) If an employee will not receive a salary increase under this
section because the employee's salary exceeds the scheduled salary level, then the employee shall
receive an annual salary increase equal to the amount of the across-the-board legislative salary
increase authorized in this Part.
SECTION 3.15.(d) Regarding the Department of Adult Correction and Division of
Juvenile Justice, these salary funds are granted with the administrative flexibility necessary to
address salary compression and related issues connected with these increases, including adjusting
the salaries of supervisors and other employees who have, when considering classification,
significantly more experience and length of service compared to other employees receiving this
pay increase.

STATE HIGHWAY PATROL SALARY SCHEDULE/STATE LAW ENFORCEMENT
OFFICER SALARY SCHEDULE/INCREASES
SECTION 3.16.(a) Effective July 1, 2025, law enforcement officers of the State
Highway Patrol, State Bureau of Investigation, and Alcohol Law Enforcement compensated
pursuant to an experience-based salary schedule shall be compensated based on the officer's
respective work experience pursuant to the salary schedule in subsection (b) of this section.
SECTION 3.16.(b) Effective July 1, 2025, the following annual salary schedule
applies under subsection (a) of this section for the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium:

Years of Experience FY 2025-27
0 $62,150
1 $66,190
2 $70,492
3 $75,074
4 $79,953
5 $85,150
6+ $90,685

SECTION 3.16.(c) If an employee will not receive a salary increase under this
section because the employee's salary exceeds the scheduled salary level, then the employee shall
receive an annual salary increase equal to the amount of the across-the-board legislative salary
increase authorized in this Part.

PROBATION AND PAROLE OFFICERS/JUVENILE COURT COUNSELORS –
SALARY SCHEDULE
SECTION 3.18.(a) Effective July 1, 2025, probation and parole officers shall be
compensated pursuant to the experience-based salary schedule based on the officer's respective
work experience, as established in subsection (b) of this section.
SECTION 3.18.(a1) Effective July 1, 2025, State employees serving in the
Department of Public Safety, Division of Juvenile Justice and Delinquency Prevention, as
Juvenile Court Counselors shall be compensated under the probation and parole officer salary
schedule, as established in subsection (b) of this section.
SECTION 3.18.(b) Effective July 1, 2025, the following annual salary schedule
applies for the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium under subsections (a) and (a1) of this section:
Senate Bill 599-Fifth Edition Page 21

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025

Years of Experience FY 2025-26
0 $48,374
1 $51,518
2 $54,869
3 $58,434
4 $62,233
5 $66,278
6+ $70,586

SECTION 3.18.(c) If an employee will not receive a salary increase under this
section because the employee's salary exceeds the scheduled salary level, then the employee shall
receive an annual salary increase equal to the amount of the across-the-board legislative salary
increase authorized in this Part.

STATE AGENCY TEACHERS
SECTION 3.19. Effective July 1, 2025, employees of schools operated by the
Department of Health and Human Services, the Department of Public Safety, the Department of
Adult Correction, the Governor Morehead School for the Blind, the Eastern North Carolina
School for the Deaf, the North Carolina School for the Deaf, and the State Board of Education
who are paid based on the Teacher Salary Schedule shall be paid as authorized under this act.

MOST STATE EMPLOYEES
SECTION 3.20. Effective July 1, 2025, unless otherwise expressly provided by this
Part, the annual salaries in effect for the following persons on June 30, 2025, shall be legislatively
increased as provided by this act:
(1) Permanent, full-time State officials and persons whose salaries are set in
accordance with the State Human Resources Act.
(2) Permanent, full-time State officials and persons in positions exempt from the
State Human Resources Act.
(3) Permanent, part-time State employees.
(4) Temporary and permanent hourly State employees.

ALL STATE-SUPPORTED PERSONNEL
SECTION 3.21.(a) The legislative salary increases authorized by this act shall be
paid effective on July 1, 2025, and do not apply to persons separated from service due to
resignation, dismissal, reduction in force, death, or retirement or whose last workday is prior to
June 30, 2025.
SECTION 3.21.(b) The Director of the Budget is granted flexibility to administer
the compensation increases enacted by this act. The State employer contribution rates enacted by
this act for retirement and related benefits may be deemed by the Director of the Budget for
administrative purposes to become effective after July 1 to provide flexibility in the collection
and reconciliation of salary-related contributions as required by law, provided the estimated
amount contributed to any affected employee benefit trust equals the amount that would have
been contributed to the employee benefit trust if the enacted employer contribution rates had
been effective on July 1.
SECTION 3.21.(c) This section applies to all employees paid from State funds,
whether or not subject to or exempt from the North Carolina Human Resources Act, including
employees of public schools, community colleges, and The University of North Carolina.

USE OF FUNDS APPROPRIATED FOR LEGISLATIVELY MANDATED INCREASES
Page 22 Senate Bill 599-Fifth Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 3.22.(a) The Office of State Budget and Management shall ensure that
the appropriations made by this act for legislatively mandated salary increases and employee
benefits are used only for those purposes.
SECTION 3.22.(b) If the Director of the Budget determines that funds appropriated
to a State agency for legislatively mandated salary increases and employee benefits exceed the
amount required by that agency for those purposes, the Director may reallocate those funds to
other State agencies that received insufficient funds for legislatively mandated salary increases
and employee benefits.
SECTION 3.22.(c) Funds appropriated for legislatively mandated salary and
employee benefit increases may not be used to adjust the budgeted salaries of vacant positions,
to provide salary increases in excess of those required by the General Assembly, or to increase
the budgeted salary of filled positions to the minimum of the position's respective salary range.
SECTION 3.22.(d) Any funds appropriated for legislatively mandated salary and
employee benefit increases in excess of the amounts required to implement the increases shall be
credited to the Pay Plan Reserve.
SECTION 3.22.(e) No later than May 1, 2026, the Office of State Budget and
Management shall report to the Fiscal Research Division on the expenditure of funds for
legislatively mandated salary increases and employee benefits. This report shall include at least
the following information for each State agency:
(1) The total amount of funds that the agency received for legislatively mandated
salary increases and employee benefits.
(2) The total amount of funds transferred from the agency to other State agencies
pursuant to subsection (b) of this section. This section of the report shall
identify the amounts transferred to each recipient State agency.
(3) The total amount of funds used by the agency for legislatively mandated salary
increases and employee benefits.
(4) The amount of funds credited to the Pay Plan Reserve.

LOCAL LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICER SUPPLEMENTAL PAY/BONUS
SECTION 3.23.(a) For the 2025-2026 fiscal year, a sworn local law enforcement
officer employed on June 30, 2025, is eligible to receive a compensation bonus in the amount of
one thousand seven hundred fifty dollars ($1,750), payable during the month of November 2025.
SECTION 3.23.(b) For the 2026-2027 fiscal year, a sworn local law enforcement
officer employed on June 30, 2026, is eligible to receive a compensation bonus in the amount of
one thousand seven hundred fifty dollars ($1,750), payable during the month of November 2026.
SECTION 3.23.(c) The funds appropriated for bonuses in excess of the amounts
required to implement these bonuses shall revert to the General Fund. The compensation bonuses
awarded by this section are not compensation for the purposes of any retirement system
administered by the State. The compensation bonuses awarded by this section are not part of
annual salary and shall be paid out separately. The compensation bonus shall be awarded to
eligible officers without regard to an officer's placement within the salary range, including
employees at the top of the salary range. The compensation bonus shall be adjusted pro rata for
permanent part-time employees.
SECTION 3.23.(d) The State Bureau of Investigation (SBI) shall award these local
law enforcement compensation bonuses as provided by this section. The SBI shall report on the
administration of the awards to the Fiscal Research Division annually by March 15, 2026, and
March 15, 2027.

ONE-TIME, COST-OF-LIVING SUPPLEMENT PAYMENT FOR RETIREES OF THE
TEACHERS' AND STATE EMPLOYEES' RETIREMENT SYSTEM, THE
Senate Bill 599-Fifth Edition Page 23

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
CONSOLIDATED JUDICIAL RETIREMENT SYSTEM, AND THE LEGISLATIVE
RETIREMENT SYSTEM
SECTION 3.24.(a) G.S. 135-5 is amended by adding the following new subsection
to read:
"(aaaa) After October 1, 2025, but on or before November 30, 2025, a one-time, cost-of-living
supplement payment shall be made to, or on account of, beneficiaries who are living as of October
1, 2025, and whose retirement commenced on or before October 1, 2025. The payment shall be
one percent (1%) of the beneficiary's annual retirement allowance payable as of October1, 2025,
and shall not be prorated for date of retirement commencement. If the beneficiary dies before the
payment is made, then the payment shall be payable to the member's legal representative. No
beneficiary shall have a vested right to any future supplemental payments under this Article.
(bbbb) After September 1, 2026, but on or before October 31, 2026, a one-time,
cost-of-living supplement payment shall be made to, or on account of, beneficiaries who are
living as of September 1, 2026, and whose retirement commenced on or before September 1,
2026. The payment shall be two percent (2%) of the beneficiary's annual retirement allowance
payable as of September 1, 2026, and shall not be prorated for date of retirement commencement.
If the beneficiary dies before the payment is made, then the payment shall be payable to the
member's legal representative. No beneficiary shall have a vested right to any future
supplemental payments under this Article."
SECTION 3.24.(b) G.S. 135-65 is amended by adding the following new subsection
to read:
"(ll) After October 1, 2025, but on or before November 30, 2025, a one-time, cost-of-living
supplement payment shall be made to, or on account of, beneficiaries who are living as of
October1, 2025, and whose retirement commenced on or before October 1, 2025. The payment
shall be one percent (1%) of the beneficiary's annual retirement allowance payable as of
October1, 2025, and shall not be prorated for date of retirement commencement. If the
beneficiary dies before the payment is made, then the payment shall be payable to the member's
legal representative. No beneficiary shall have a vested right to any future supplemental payments
under this Article.
(mm) After September 1, 2026, but on or before October 31, 2026, a one-time,
cost-of-living supplement payment shall be made to, or on account of, beneficiaries who are
living as of September 1, 2026, and whose retirement commenced on or before September 1,
2026. The payment shall be two percent (2%) of the beneficiary's annual retirement allowance
payable as of September 1, 2026, and shall not be prorated for date of retirement commencement.
If the beneficiary dies before the payment is made, then the payment shall be payable to the
member's legal representative. No beneficiary shall have a vested right to any future
supplemental payments under this Article."
SECTION 3.24.(c) G.S. 120-4.22A is amended by adding the following new
subsection to read:
"(ff) In accordance with subsection (a) of this section, after October 1, 2025, but on or
before November 30, 2025, a one-time, cost-of-living supplement payment shall be made to, or
on account of, beneficiaries who are living as of October 1, 2025, and whose retirement
commenced on or before October 1, 2025. The payment shall be one percent (1%) of the
beneficiary's annual retirement allowance payable as of October 1, 2025, and shall not be
prorated for date of retirement commencement. If the beneficiary dies before the payment is
made, then the payment shall be payable to the member's legal representative. No beneficiary
shall have a vested right to any future supplemental payments under this Article.
(gg) In accordance with subsection (a) of this section, after September 1, 2026, but on or
before October 31, 2026, a one-time, cost-of-living supplement payment shall be made to, or on
account of, beneficiaries who are living as of September 1, 2026, and whose retirement
commenced on or before September 1, 2026. The payment shall be two percent (2%) of the
Page 24 Senate Bill 599-Fifth Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
beneficiary's annual retirement allowance payable as of September 1, 2026, and shall not be
prorated for date of retirement commencement. If the beneficiary dies before the payment is
made, then the payment shall be payable to the member's legal representative. No beneficiary
shall have a vested right to any future supplemental payments under this Article."
SECTION 3.24.(d) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Retiree
Supplement Reserve in the Office of State Budget and Management the sum of forty-one million
thirty-eight thousand seven hundred eighty-three dollars ($41,038,783) in nonrecurring funds for
the 2025-2026 fiscal year and the sum of eighty-two million seventy-seven thousand five hundred
sixty-six dollars ($82,077,566) in nonrecurring funds for the 2026-2027 fiscal year to be
distributed accordingly to implement this section.

UPDATES TO SALARY-RELATED CONTRIBUTIONS
SECTION 3.25.(a) Section 3.6(b) of S.L. 2025-89 reads as rewritten:
"SECTION 3.6.(b) Effective July 1, 2025, the State's employer contribution rates budgeted
for retirement, health, and related benefits as a percentage of covered salaries for the 2025-2026
fiscal year for teachers and State employees, State law enforcement officers (LEOs), the
University and Community Colleges Optional Retirement Programs (ORPs), the Consolidated
Judicial Retirement System (CJRS), and the Legislative Retirement System (LRS) are as set forth
below:
Teachers State ORPs CJRS LRS
and State LEOs
Employees
Retirement 17.14%17.44%17.14%17.44% 6.84% 37.73%38.36%18.26%18.90%
Health 7.33% 7.33% 7.33% 7.33% 7.33%
Disability 0.07% 0.07% 0.07% 0.00% 0.00%
Death 0.13% 0.13% 0.00% 0.00% 0.00%
NC 401(k) 0.00% 5.00% 0.00% 0.00% 0.00%

Total Contribution
Rate 24.67%24.97%29.67%29.97%14.24% 45.06%45.69%25.59%26.23%
The rate for health includes two and four-tenths percent (2.40%) for the Public Employee
Health Benefit Fund and four and ninety-three hundredths percent (4.93%) for the Retiree
Health Benefit Fund."
SECTION 3.25.(b) When setting the salary-related contribution rates for the 2026-
2027 fiscal yar, it is the intent of the General Assembly to incorporate the appropriate
contribution rate for the one-time supplement provided for that fiscal year under this section.

PART IV. MISCELLANEOUS

STATE BUDGET ACT APPLICABILITY
SECTION 4.1. If any provision of this act and S.L. 2025-89 or G.S. 143C-5-4 are in
conflict, the provisions of this act shall prevail. The appropriations and the authorizations to
allocate and spend funds which are set out in this act shall remain in effect until the Current
Operations Appropriations Act for the applicable fiscal year becomes law, at which time that act
shall become effective and shall govern appropriations and expenditures. When the Current
Operations Appropriations Act for that fiscal year becomes law, the Director of the Budget shall
adjust allotments to give effect to that act from July 1 of the fiscal year.

EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 4.2. This section is effective when it becomes law. The remainder of this
act is effective July 1, 2025, upon enactment of a bill denominated a "Current Operations
Senate Bill 599-Fifth Edition Page 25

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
Appropriations Act" meeting the definition of that term as set forth in G.S. 143C-1-1 for the
2025-2026 Fiscal Year.
Page 26 Senate Bill 599-Fifth Edition